test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     waawaatesi: waawaatesi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1waawaatesi: niwaawaatesi
     +Px2waawaatesi: giwaawaatesi
     +Px3waawaatesi: owaawaatesi
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi: iwaawaatesi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waawaatesi+Dim: waawaatesiens
     waawaatesi+Con: waawaatesienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     waawaatesi+Pos: waawaatesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     waawaatesi+Pej: waawaatesiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl: waawaatesiinaan
     waawaatesi+PosPl: waawaatesiiwaa
     waawaatesi+PosObv: waawaatesiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     waawaatesi+Pret: waawaatesiiban
     waawaatesi+VocPl: waawaatesi***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     waawaatesi+Obv: waawaatesian
     waawaatesi+Pl: waawaatesiag
     waawaatesi+Loc: waawaatesiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim: niwaawaatesiens
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con: niwaawaatesienh
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim: giwaawaatesiens
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con: giwaawaatesienh
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim: owaawaatesiens
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con: owaawaatesienh
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim: iwaawaatesiens
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con: iwaawaatesienh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos: niwaawaatesiim
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos: giwaawaatesiim
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos: owaawaatesiim
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos: iwaawaatesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pej: niwaawaatesiish
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pej: giwaawaatesiish
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pej: owaawaatesiish
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej: iwaawaatesiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl: niwaawaatesiinaan
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl: niwaawaatesiiwaa
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv: niwaawaatesiini
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl: giwaawaatesiinaan
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl: giwaawaatesiiwaa
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv: giwaawaatesiini
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl: owaawaatesiinaan
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl: owaawaatesiiwaa
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv: owaawaatesiini
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl: iwaawaatesiinaan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl: iwaawaatesiiwaa
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv: iwaawaatesiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pret: niwaawaatesiiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+VocPl: niwaawaatesi***idig, idog***
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pret: giwaawaatesiiban
     +Px2waawaatesi+VocPl: giwaawaatesi***idig, idog***
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pret: owaawaatesiiban
     +Px3waawaatesi+VocPl: owaawaatesi***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pret: iwaawaatesiiban
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+VocPl: iwaawaatesi***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1waawaatesi+Obv: niwaawaatesian
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pl: niwaawaatesiag
     +Px1waawaatesi+Loc: niwaawaatesiing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Obv: giwaawaatesian
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pl: giwaawaatesiag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Loc: giwaawaatesiing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Obv: owaawaatesian
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pl: owaawaatesiag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Loc: owaawaatesiing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Obv: iwaawaatesian
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pl: iwaawaatesiag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Loc: iwaawaatesiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos: waawaatesiensim
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos: waawaatesienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej: waawaatesiensish
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej: waawaatesienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl: waawaatesiensinaan
     waawaatesi+Dim+PosPl: waawaatesiensiwaa
     waawaatesi+Dim+PosObv: waawaatesiensini
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos1Pl: waawaatesienhinaan
     waawaatesi+Con+PosPl: waawaatesienhiwaa
     waawaatesi+Con+PosObv: waawaatesienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pret: waawaatesiensiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+VocPl: waawaatesiens***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pret: waawaatesienhiban
     waawaatesi+Con+VocPl: waawaatesienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Obv: waawaatesiensan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pl: waawaatesiensag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Loc: waawaatesiensing
     waawaatesi+Con+Obv: waawaatesienhan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pl: waawaatesienhag
     waawaatesi+Con+Loc: waawaatesienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej: waawaatesiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pos1Pl: waawaatesiiminaan
     waawaatesi+Pos+PosPl: waawaatesiimiwaa
     waawaatesi+Pos+PosObv: waawaatesiimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pret: waawaatesiimiban
     waawaatesi+Pos+VocPl: waawaatesiim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     waawaatesi+Pos+Obv: waawaatesiiman
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pl: waawaatesiimag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Loc: waawaatesiiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     waawaatesi+Pej+Pos1Pl: waawaatesiishinaan
     waawaatesi+Pej+PosPl: waawaatesiishiwaa
     waawaatesi+Pej+PosObv: waawaatesiishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     waawaatesi+Pej+Pret: waawaatesiishiban
     waawaatesi+Pej+VocPl: waawaatesiish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     waawaatesi+Pej+Obv: waawaatesiishan
     waawaatesi+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiishag
     waawaatesi+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesiinaaniban
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesiiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesiiniiban
     waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesiini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesiinaanan
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesiinaanag
     waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinaaning
     waawaatesi+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesiiwaaan
     waawaatesi+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesiiwaaag
     waawaatesi+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesiiwaaing
     waawaatesi+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesiinian
     waawaatesi+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesiiniag
     waawaatesi+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesiiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiibanan
     waawaatesi+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiibanag
     waawaatesi+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiibaning
     waawaatesi+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesi***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesi***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesi***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos: niwaawaatesiensim
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos: niwaawaatesienhim
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos: giwaawaatesiensim
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos: giwaawaatesienhim
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos: owaawaatesiensim
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos: owaawaatesienhim
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos: iwaawaatesiensim
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos: iwaawaatesienhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pej: niwaawaatesiensish
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pej: niwaawaatesienhish
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pej: giwaawaatesiensish
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pej: giwaawaatesienhish
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pej: owaawaatesiensish
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pej: owaawaatesienhish
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pej: iwaawaatesiensish
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pej: iwaawaatesienhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl: niwaawaatesiensinaan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+PosPl: niwaawaatesiensiwaa
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+PosObv: niwaawaatesiensini
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos1Pl: niwaawaatesienhinaan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+PosPl: niwaawaatesienhiwaa
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+PosObv: niwaawaatesienhini
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl: giwaawaatesiensinaan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+PosPl: giwaawaatesiensiwaa
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+PosObv: giwaawaatesiensini
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos1Pl: giwaawaatesienhinaan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+PosPl: giwaawaatesienhiwaa
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+PosObv: giwaawaatesienhini
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl: owaawaatesiensinaan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+PosPl: owaawaatesiensiwaa
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+PosObv: owaawaatesiensini
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos1Pl: owaawaatesienhinaan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+PosPl: owaawaatesienhiwaa
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+PosObv: owaawaatesienhini
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl: iwaawaatesiensinaan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+PosPl: iwaawaatesiensiwaa
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+PosObv: iwaawaatesiensini
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos1Pl: iwaawaatesienhinaan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+PosPl: iwaawaatesienhiwaa
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+PosObv: iwaawaatesienhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pret: niwaawaatesiensiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+VocPl: niwaawaatesiens***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pret: niwaawaatesienhiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+VocPl: niwaawaatesienh***idig, idog***
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pret: giwaawaatesiensiban
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+VocPl: giwaawaatesiens***idig, idog***
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pret: giwaawaatesienhiban
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+VocPl: giwaawaatesienh***idig, idog***
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pret: owaawaatesiensiban
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+VocPl: owaawaatesiens***idig, idog***
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pret: owaawaatesienhiban
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+VocPl: owaawaatesienh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pret: iwaawaatesiensiban
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+VocPl: iwaawaatesiens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pret: iwaawaatesienhiban
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+VocPl: iwaawaatesienh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Obv: niwaawaatesiensan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pl: niwaawaatesiensag
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Loc: niwaawaatesiensing
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Obv: niwaawaatesienhan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pl: niwaawaatesienhag
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Loc: niwaawaatesienhing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Obv: giwaawaatesiensan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pl: giwaawaatesiensag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Loc: giwaawaatesiensing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Obv: giwaawaatesienhan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pl: giwaawaatesienhag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Loc: giwaawaatesienhing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Obv: owaawaatesiensan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pl: owaawaatesiensag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Loc: owaawaatesiensing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Obv: owaawaatesienhan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pl: owaawaatesienhag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Loc: owaawaatesienhing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Obv: iwaawaatesiensan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pl: iwaawaatesiensag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Loc: iwaawaatesiensing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Obv: iwaawaatesienhan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pl: iwaawaatesienhag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Loc: iwaawaatesienhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+Pej: niwaawaatesiimish
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos+Pej: giwaawaatesiimish
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos+Pej: owaawaatesiimish
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos+Pej: iwaawaatesiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+Pos1Pl: niwaawaatesiiminaan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+PosPl: niwaawaatesiimiwaa
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+PosObv: niwaawaatesiimini
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos+Pos1Pl: giwaawaatesiiminaan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos+PosPl: giwaawaatesiimiwaa
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos+PosObv: giwaawaatesiimini
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos+Pos1Pl: owaawaatesiiminaan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos+PosPl: owaawaatesiimiwaa
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos+PosObv: owaawaatesiimini
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos+Pos1Pl: iwaawaatesiiminaan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos+PosPl: iwaawaatesiimiwaa
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos+PosObv: iwaawaatesiimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+Pret: niwaawaatesiimiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos+VocPl: niwaawaatesiim***idig, idog***
